Utah statutes.
76-10-1223.   Distribution of film without being qualified -- Exhibition of film not acquired from qualified distributor -- Penalties for violations.

(1) Any person who knowingly distributes any film for exhibition within this state without being qualified to do so, or who knowingly exhibits a film in this state which has not been acquired from a distributor qualified to distribute films in this state is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and shall, for each separate offense, be fined not less than $299 and imprisoned, without suspension of sentence in any way, for a term of not less than 30 days.

(2)  Any person convicted of a violation of this section, who has been convicted before of a violation of this section, shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall, for each separate offense, be fined not less than $1,000 and imprisoned, without suspension of sentence in any way, for a term of not less than 60 days.

(3)  Each day's exhibition of such a film, and each copy of a film distributed for exhibition within this state, shall constitute a separate offense.



Enacted by Chapter 93, 1977 General Session

